Maryland, session 2026, SB0955.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
11–109.
(c) (17) (I) THIS PARAGRAPH APPLIES ONLY TO AN ELECTION IN A
RESIDENTIAL CONDOMINIUM IN WHICH THE NUMBER OF CANDIDATES EXCEEDS THE
NUMBER OF CONTESTED SEATS.
[(i)] (II) Elections, including the collection and counting of ballots
and the certifying of results, for officers or members of the governing body other than the
full membership of the council of unit owners shall be conducted by independent parties
who:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0955*

SENATE BILL 955
1. Are not candidates in the election; and
2. Do not have a conflict of interest regarding any candidate
in the election.
[(ii)] (III) A unit owner is an independent party if the unit owner:
1. Complies with the requirements of this section;
2. Does not electioneer for any candidate; and
3. Is not subject to an objection by more than 25 percent of
the eligible voting members of the council of unit owners.
[(iii)] (IV) Unless property management for a condominium is owned
by the condominium, or a parent association of the condominium, representatives of the
condominium’s property management are not independent parties.
11B–118.
(a) (1) THIS SUBSECTION APPLIES ONLY TO AN ELECTION IN WHICH THE
NUMBER OF CANDIDATES EXCEEDS THE NUMBER OF CONTESTED SEATS.
[(1)] (2) Elections for the governing body of a homeowners association,
including the collection and counting of ballots and the certifying of results, shall be
conducted by independent parties who:
(i) Are not candidates for positions on the governing body of the
homeowners association in that election; and
(ii) Do not have a conflict of interest regarding any candidate in the
election.
[(2)] (3) (i) Unless property management for a homeowners
association, or a parent association of the homeowners association, is owned by the
homeowners association, representatives of the homeowners association’s property
management are not independent parties.
(ii) A lot owner is an independent party if the lot owner:
1. Complies with the requirements of this subsection;
2. Does not electioneer for any candidate; and
3. Is not subject to an objection by more than 25 percent of
the eligible voting members of the homeowners association.

SENATE BILL 955 3
(iii) The homeowners association may retain a third–party vendor or
employ a commercial technology platform to conduct the election.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.